Utah statutes.
58-56-8.5.   Building Inspector Licensing Board.

(1)  There is created a Building Inspector Licensing Board consisting of four building inspectors and one member of the general public.

(2)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(3)  The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be in accordance with Sections 58-1-202 through 58-1-203.  In addition, the board shall designate one of its members on a permanent or rotating basis to:

(a)  assist the division in reviewing complaints concerning the unlawful or unprofessional conduct of a licensee; and

(b)  advise the division in its investigation of these complaints.

(4)  A board member who has, under Subsection (3), reviewed a complaint or advised in its investigation is disqualified from participating with the board when the board serves as a presiding officer of an administrative proceeding concerning the complaint.



Enacted by Chapter 262, 1995 General Session

